dict/pt_BR.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX s   0       a-te           cernir
SFX s   0       a-vos          cernir
SFX s   0       -la-á          cernir
SFX s   0       -las-á         cernir
SFX s   0       -lhe-á         cernir
SFX s   0       -lhes-á        cernir
SFX s   0       -lo-á          cernir
SFX s   0       -los-á         cernir
SFX s   0       -me-á          cernir
SFX s   0       -nos-á         cernir
SFX s   0       -se-á          cernir
SFX s   0       -te-á          cernir
SFX s   0       -vos-á         cernir
SFX s   0       am-lhe         cernir
SFX s   0       am-lhes        cernir
SFX s   0       am-me          cernir
SFX s   0       am-na          cernir
SFX s   0       am-nas         cernir
SFX s   0       am-no          cernir
SFX s   0       am-nos         cernir
SFX s   0       am-se          cernir
SFX s   0       am-te          cernir
SFX s   0       am-vos         cernir
SFX s   0       -lhe-ão        cernir
SFX s   0       -lhes-ão       cernir
SFX s   0       -me-ão         cernir
SFX s   0       -na-ão         cernir
SFX s   0       -nas-ão        cernir
SFX s   0       -no-ão         cernir
SFX s   0       -nos-ão        cernir
SFX s   0       -se-ão         cernir
SFX s   0       -te-ão         cernir
SFX s   0       -vos-ão        cernir
SFX s   0       -lhe-ei        cernir
SFX s   0       -lhes-ei       cernir
SFX s   0       -me-ei         cernir
SFX s   0       -nos-ei        cernir
SFX s   0       -se-ei         cernir
SFX s   0       -te-ei         cernir
SFX s   0       -vos-ei        cernir
SFX s   0       em-lhe         cernir
SFX s   0       em-lhes        cernir
SFX s   0       em-me          cernir
SFX s   0       em-na          cernir
SFX s   0       em-nas         cernir
SFX s   0       em-no          cernir
SFX s   0       em-nos         cernir
SFX s   0       em-se          cernir
SFX s   0       em-te          cernir
SFX s   0       em-vos         cernir
SFX s   0       -la-emos       cernir
SFX s   0       -las-emos      cernir
SFX s   0       -lhe-emos      cernir
SFX s   0       -lhes-emos     cernir
SFX s   0       -lo-emos       cernir
SFX s   0       -los-emos      cernir
SFX s   0       -nos-emos      cernir
SFX s   0       -te-emos       cernir
SFX s   0       -vos-emos      cernir
SFX s   0       -lhe-ia        cernir
SFX s   0       -lhes-ia       cernir
SFX s   0       -me-ia         cernir
SFX s   0       -nos-ia        cernir
SFX s   0       -se-ia         cernir
SFX s   0       -te-ia         cernir
SFX s   0       -vos-ia        cernir
SFX s   0       -lhe-iam       cernir
SFX s   0       -lhes-iam      cernir
SFX s   0       -me-iam        cernir
SFX s   0       -nos-iam       cernir
SFX s   0       -se-iam        cernir
SFX s   0       -te-iam        cernir
SFX s   0       -vos-iam       cernir
SFX s   0       íamo-nos       cernir
SFX s   0       íamo-vos       cernir
SFX s   0       íamos-lhe      cernir
SFX s   0       íamos-lhes     cernir
SFX s   0       íamos-te       cernir
SFX s   0       mo-nos         cernir
SFX s   0       mo-vos         cernir
SFX s   0       mos-lhe        cernir
SFX s   0       mos-lhes       cernir
SFX s   0       mos-te         cernir
SFX s   r       sse-a          cernir
SFX s   r       sse-as         cernir
SFX s   r       sse-lhe        cernir
SFX s   r       sse-lhes       cernir
SFX s   r       sse-me         cernir
SFX s   r       sse-nos        cernir
SFX s   r       sse-o          cernir
SFX s   r       sse-os         cernir
SFX s   r       sse-se         cernir
SFX s   r       sse-te         cernir
SFX s   r       sse-vos        cernir
SFX s   r       ssem-lhe       cernir
SFX s   r       ssem-lhes      cernir
SFX s   r       ssem-me        cernir
SFX s   r       ssem-na        cernir
SFX s   r       ssem-nas       cernir
SFX s   r       ssem-no        cernir
SFX s   r       ssem-nos       cernir
SFX s   r       ssem-te        cernir
SFX s   r       ssem-vos       cernir
SFX s   r       ste-a          cernir
SFX s   r       ste-as         cernir
SFX s   r       ste-lhe        cernir
SFX s   r       ste-lhes       cernir
SFX s   r       ste-me         cernir
SFX s   r       ste-nos        cernir
SFX s   r       ste-o          cernir
SFX s   r       ste-os         cernir
SFX s   r       ste-se         cernir
SFX s   r       ste-te         cernir
SFX s   r       ste-vos        cernir
SFX s   r       u-a            cernir
SFX s   r       u-as           cernir
SFX s   r       u-lhe          cernir
SFX s   r       u-lhes         cernir
SFX s   r       u-me           cernir
SFX s   r       u-nos          cernir
SFX s   r       u-o            cernir
SFX s   r       u-os           cernir
SFX s   r       u-se           cernir
SFX s   r       u-te           cernir
SFX s   r       u-vos          cernir
SFX s   ernir   irna-a         cernir
SFX s   ernir   irna-as        cernir
SFX s   ernir   irna-lhe       cernir
SFX s   ernir   irna-lhes      cernir
SFX s   ernir   irna-me        cernir
SFX s   ernir   irna-nos       cernir
SFX s   ernir   irna-o         cernir
SFX s   ernir   irna-os        cernir
SFX s   ernir   irna-se        cernir
SFX s   ernir   irna-te        cernir
SFX s   ernir   irna-vos       cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnam-lhe      cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnam-lhes     cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnam-me       cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnam-na       cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnam-nas      cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnam-no       cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnam-nos      cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnam-se       cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnam-te       cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnam-vos      cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnamo-nos     cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnamo-vos     cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnamos-lhe    cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnamos-lhes   cernir
SFX s   ernir   irnamos-te     cernir
SFX s   ernir   irno-a         cernir
SFX s   ernir   irno-as        cernir
SFX s   ernir   irno-lhe       cernir
SFX s   ernir   irno-lhes      cernir
SFX s   ernir   irno-me        cernir
SFX s   ernir   irno-o         cernir
SFX s   ernir   irno-os        cernir
SFX s   ernir   irno-te        cernir
SFX s   ernir   irno-vos       cernir
SFX s   ir      e-a            dormir
SFX s   ir      e-as           dormir
SFX s   ir      e-lhe          dormir
SFX s   ir      e-lhes         dormir
SFX s   ir      e-me           dormir
SFX s   ir      e-nos          dormir
SFX s   ir      e-o            dormir
SFX s   ir      e-os           dormir
SFX s   ir      e-se           dormir
SFX s   ir      e-te           dormir
SFX s   ir      e-vos          dormir
SFX s   ir      em-lhe         dormir
SFX s   ir      em-lhes        dormir
SFX s   ir      em-me          dormir
SFX s   ir      em-na          dormir
SFX s   ir      em-nas         dormir
SFX s   ir      em-no          dormir
SFX s   ir      em-nos         dormir
SFX s   ir      em-se          dormir
SFX s   ir      em-te          dormir
SFX s   ir      em-vos         dormir
SFX s   r       -a             dormir
SFX s   r       -as            dormir
SFX s   r       -lhe           dormir
SFX s   r       -lhes          dormir
SFX s   r       -me            dormir
SFX s   r       -nos           dormir
SFX s   r       -o             dormir
SFX s   r       -os            dormir
SFX s   r       -se            dormir
SFX s   r       -te            dormir
SFX s   r       -vos           dormir
SFX s   r       a-a            dormir
SFX s   r       a-as           dormir
SFX s   r       a-lhe          dormir
SFX s   r       a-lhes         dormir
SFX s   r       a-me           dormir
SFX s   r       a-nos          dormir
SFX s   r       a-o            dormir
SFX s   r       a-os           dormir
SFX s   r       a-se           dormir
SFX s   r       a-te           dormir
SFX s   r       a-vos          dormir
SFX s   r       am-lhe         dormir
SFX s   r       am-lhes        dormir
SFX s   r       am-me          dormir
SFX s   r       am-na          dormir
SFX s   r       am-nas         dormir
SFX s   r       am-no          dormir
SFX s   r       am-nos         dormir
